Washington statutes.
RCW 12.04.205

Form of a writ of attachment.

FORM OF A WRIT OF ATTACHMENT

State of Washington,

County of . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .,











ss.

To the sheriff or any constable of said county:

In the name of the state of Washington, you are commanded to attach, and safely keep, the goods and chattels, moneys, effects and credits of C D, (excepting such as the law exempts), or so much thereof as shall satisfy the sum of . . . . . . dollars, with interest and cost

of suit, in whosesoever hands or possession the same may be found in your county, and to provide that the goods and chattels so attached may be subject to further proceeding thereon, as the law requires; and of this writ make legal service and due return.

Given under my hand this . . . . day of . . . . . . . . . ., (year) . . . .

J. P., Justice of the Peace.

[ 2016 c 202 s 16; 1957 c 89 s 7. Prior: Code 1881 s 1885, part; 1873 p 373 c 16, part; 1863 p 370 c 16, part; 1854 p 253 c 19, part; RRS s 1890, part.]